Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-204, as
last amended by Section 3, Chapter 308, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2-204), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-204. The controlled substances listed in this section
are included in Schedule I and include any material, compound,
mixture or preparation that contains any quantity of the following
hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers and salts of
isomers, unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these
salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation.

Req. No. 10084 Page 1

A. Any of the following opiates including their isomers,
esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers,
unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these isomers,
esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
1. Acetylmethadol;
2. Allylprodine;
3. Alphacetylmethadol;
4. Alphameprodine;
5. Alphamethadol;
6. Benzethidine;
7. Betacetylmethadol;
8. Betameprodine;
9. Betamethadol;
10. Betaprodine;
11. Clonitazene;
12. Dextromoramide;
13. Dextrorphan (except its methyl ether);
14. Diampromide;
15. Diethylthiambutene;
16. Dimenoxadol;
17. Dimepheptanol;
18. Dimethylthiambutene;
19. Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
Req. No. 10084 Page 2

20. Dipipanone;
21. Ethylmethylthiambutene;
22. Etonitazene;
23. Etoxeridine;
24. Furethidine;
25. Hydroxypethidine;
26. Isotonitazene;
27. Ketobemidone;
28. Levomoramide;
29. Levophenacylmorphan;
30. Metonitazene;
31. Morpheridine;
32. N-desethyl isotonitazene;
33. N-pyrrolidino protonitazene;
34. Noracymethadol;
35. Norlevorphanol;
36. Normethadone;
37. Norpipanone;
38. Phenadoxone;
39. Phenampromide;
40. Phenomorphan;
41. Phenoperidine;
42. Piritramide;
43. Proheptazine;
Req. No. 10084 Page 3

44. Properidine;
45. Protonitazene;
46. Racemoramide; or
47. Trimeperidine.
B. Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, when
the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation:
1. Acetorphine;
2. Acetyldihydrocodeine;
3. Benzylmorphine;
4. Codeine methylbromide;
5. Codeine-N-Oxide;
6. Cyprenorphine;
7. Desomorphine;
8. Dihydromorphine;
9. Etorphine;
10. Heroin;
11. Hydromorphinol;
12. Methyldesorphine;
13. Methylhydromorphine;
14. Morphine methylbromide;
15. Morphine methylsulfonate;
16. Morphine-N-Oxide;
Req. No. 10084 Page 4

17. Myrophine;
18. Nicocodeine;
19. Nicomorphine;
20. Normorphine;
21. Phoclodine;
22. Thebacon;
23. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-acetamide
(Acetyl fentanyl);
24. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butenamide
(Crotonyl fentanyl);
25. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-
furancarboxamide (Furanyl fentanyl);
26. N-phenyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinamine (4-ANPP);
27. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide (Cyclopropyl fentanyl); or
28. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butanamide
(Butyrl fentanyl).
C. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances,
their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically
excepted, when the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
1. Methcathinone;
2. 3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
Req. No. 10084 Page 5

3. 3, 4-methylenedioxy methamphetamine;
4. 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
5. 3, 4, 5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
6. Bufotenine;
7. Diethyltryptamine;
8. Dimethyltryptamine;
9. 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
10. Ibogaine;
11. Lysergic acid diethylamide;
12. Marijuana;
13. Mescaline;
14. N-benzylpiperazine;
15. N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
16. N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
17. Psilocybin;
18. Psilocyn;
19. 2, 5 dimethoxyamphetamine;
20. 4 Bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
21. 4 methoxyamphetamine;
22. Cyclohexamine;
23. Salvia Divinorum;
24. Salvinorin A;


Req. No. 10084 Page 6

25. Thiophene Analog of Phencyclidine. Also known as: 1-(1-(2-
thienyl) cyclohexyl) piperidine; 2-Thienyl Analog of Phencyclidine;
TPCP, TCP;
26. Phencyclidine (PCP);
27. Pyrrolidine Analog for Phencyclidine. Also known as 1-(1-
Phenylcyclohexyl) - Pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;
28. 1-(3-trifluoromethylphenyl) piperazine;
29. Flunitrazepam;
30. B-hydroxy-amphetamine;
31. B-ketoamphetamine;
32. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitroamphetamine;
33. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine;
34. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine;
35. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine;
36. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine;
37. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine;
38. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylphenethylamine;
39. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-fluorophenethylamine;
40. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine;
41. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylthio-phenethylamine;
42. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-isopropylthio-phenethylamine;
43. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-propylthio-phenethylamine;
44. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-cyclopropylmethylthio-phenethylamine;
45. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-tert-butylthio-phenethylamine;
Req. No. 10084 Page 7

46. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(2-fluoroethylthio)-phenethylamine;
47. 5-methoxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine;
48. N-methyltryptamine;
49. A-ethyltryptamine;
50. A-methyltryptamine;
51. N, N-diethyltryptamine;
52. N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
53. N, N-dipropyltryptamine;
54. 5-methoxy-a-methyltryptamine;
55. 4-hydroxy-N, N-diethyltryptamine;
56. 4-hydroxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
57. 5-methoxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
58. 4-hydroxy-N-isopropyl-N-methyltryptamine;
59. 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone (Methylone);
60. 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV);
61. 3-Methylmethcathinone (Metaphedrone);
62. 4-Methylmethcathinone (Mephedrone);
63. 4-methoxymethcathinone;
64. 4-Fluoromethcathinone;
65. 3-Fluoromethcathinone;
66. 1-(8-bromobenzo 1,2-b;4,5-b' difuran-4-yl)-2-aminopropane;
67. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine;
68. 4-Methylethcathinone;
69. Pyrovalerone;
Req. No. 10084 Page 8

70. N,N-diallyl-5-methoxytryptamine;
71. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone (Ethylone);
72. B-keto-N-Methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine (Butylone);
73. B-keto-Methylbenzodioxolylpentanamine (Pentylone);
74. Alpha-Pyrrolidinopentiophenone;
75. 4-Fluoroamphetamine;
76. Pentedrone;
77. 4'-Methyl-a-pyrrolidinohexaphenone;
78. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenethylamine;
79. 2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
80. 1,4-Dibenzylpiperazine;
81. N,N-Dimethylamphetamine;
82. 4-Fluoromethamphetamine;
83. 4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine
(25C-NBOMe);
84. 4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine
(25I-NBOMe);
85. 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzy)phenethylamine
(25B-NBOMe);
86. 1-(4-Fluorophenyl)piperazine;
87. Methoxetamine;
88. 3,4-dichloro-N[2-dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-
methylbenzamide;
89. N-ethyl hexadrone;
Req. No. 10084 Page 9

90. Isopropyl-U-47700;
91. Para-fluorobutyrl fentanyl;
92. Para-fluorofentanyl (pFF);
93. Fluoro isobutryrl fentanyl;
94. 3-Hydroxy Phencyclidine (PCP);
95. 3-methoxy Phencyclidine (PCP);
96. Flualprazolam; or
97. Flubromazolam;
98. Ethyleneoxynitazene;
99. 5-Methyl Etodesnitazene;
100. 3', 4' Methylenedioxynitazene;
101. N-Pyrrolidino Isotonitazene;
102. N-Desethyl Etonitazene; or
103. Ethylene Etonitazene.
D. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in a different
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having stimulant
or depressant effect on the central nervous system:
1. Fenethylline;
2. Mecloqualone;
3. N-ethylamphetamine;
4. Methaqualone;


Req. No. 10084 Page 10

5. Gamma-Hydroxybutyric Acid, also known as GHB, gamma-
hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutanoic acid, sodium
oxybate, and sodium oxybutyrate;
6. Gamma-Butyrolactone (GBL) as packaged, marketed,
manufactured or promoted for human consumption, with the exception
of legitimate food additive and manufacturing purposes;
7. Gamma Hydroxyvalerate (GHV) as packaged, marketed, or
manufactured for human consumption, with the exception of legitimate
food additive and manufacturing purposes;
8. Gamma Valerolactone (GVL) as packaged, marketed, or
manufactured for human consumption, with the exception of legitimate
food additive and manufacturing purposes;
9. 1,4 Butanediol (1,4 BD or BDO) as packaged, marketed,
manufactured, or promoted for human consumption with the exception
of legitimate manufacturing purposes; or
10. N-ethylpentylone.
E. 1. The following industrial uses of Gamma-Butyrolactone,
Gamma Hydroxyvalerate, Gamma Valerolactone, or 1,4 Butanediol are
excluded from all schedules of controlled substances under this
title:
a. pesticides,
b. photochemical etching,
c. electrolytes of small batteries or capacitors,
d. viscosity modifiers in polyurethane,
Req. No. 10084 Page 11

e. surface etching of metal coated plastics,
f. organic paint disbursements for water soluble inks,
g. pH regulators in the dyeing of wool and polyamide
fibers,
h. foundry chemistry as a catalyst during curing,
i. curing agents in many coating systems based on
urethanes and amides,
j. additives and flavoring agents in food, confectionary,
and beverage products,
k. synthetic fiber and clothing production,
l. tetrahydrofuran production,
m. gamma butyrolactone production,
n. polybutylene terephthalate resin production,
o. polyester raw materials for polyurethane elastomers
and foams,
p. coating resin raw material, and
q. as an intermediate in the manufacture of other
chemicals and pharmaceuticals.
2. At the request of any person, the Director of the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control may exempt any
other product containing Gamma-Butyrolactone, Gamma Hydroxyvalerate,
Gamma Valerolactone, or 1,4 Butanediol from being included as a
Schedule I controlled substance if such product is labeled,

Req. No. 10084 Page 12

mark eted, manufactured and distributed for legitimate industrial use
in a manner that reduces or eliminates the likelihood of abuse.
3. In making a determination regarding an industrial product,
the Director, after notice and hearing, shall consider the
following:
a. the history and current pattern of abuse,
b. the name and labeling of the product,
c. the intended manner of distribution, advertising and
promotion of the product, and
d. other factors as may be relevant to and consistent
with the public health and safety.
4. The hearing shall be held in accordance with the procedures
of the Administrative Procedures Act.
F. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation, whether
produced directly or indirectly from a substance of vegetable origin
or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination
of extraction and chemical synthesis, that contains any quantity of
the following substances, or that contains any of their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of these salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
1. JWH-004;
2. JWH-007;
3. JWH-009;
Req. No. 10084 Page 13

4. JWH-015;
5. JWH-016;
6. JWH-018;
7. JWH-019;
8. JWH-020;
9. JWH-030;
10. JWH-046;
11. JWH-047;
12. JWH-048;
13. JWH-049;
14. JWH-050;
15. JWH-070;
16. JWH-071;
17. JWH-072;
18. JWH-073;
19. JWH-076;
20. JWH-079;
21. JWH-080;
22. JWH-081;
23. JWH-082;
24. JWH-094;
25. JWH-096;
26. JWH-098;
27. JWH-116;
Req. No. 10084 Page 14

28. JWH-120;
29. JWH-122;
30. JWH-145;
31. JWH-146;
32. JWH-147;
33. JWH-148;
34. JWH-149;
35. JWH-150;
36. JWH-156;
37. JWH-167;
38. JWH-175;
39. JWH-180;
40. JWH-181;
41. JWH-182;
42. JWH-184;
43. JWH-185;
44. JWH-189;
45. JWH-192;
46. JWH-193;
47. JWH-194;
48. JWH-195;
49. JWH-196;
50. JWH-197;
51. JWH-198;
Req. No. 10084 Page 15

52. JWH-199;
53. JWH-200;
54. JWH-201;
55. JWH-202;
56. JWH-203;
57. JWH-204;
58. JWH-205;
59. JWH-206;
60. JWH-207;
61. JWH-208;
62. JWH-209;
63. JWH-210;
64. JWH-211;
65. JWH-212;
66. JWH-213;
67. JWH-234;
68. JWH-235;
69. JWH-236;
70. JWH-237;
71. JWH-239;
72. JWH-240;
73. JWH-241;
74. JWH-242;
75. JWH-243;
Req. No. 10084 Page 16

76. JWH-244;
77. JWH-245;
78. JWH-246;
79. JWH-248;
80. JWH-249;
81. JWH-250;
82. JWH-251;
83. JWH-252;
84. JWH-253;
85. JWH-262;
86. JWH-292;
87. JWH-293;
88. JWH-302;
89. JWH-303;
90. JWH-304;
91. JWH-305;
92. JWH-306;
93. JWH-307;
94. JWH-308;
95. JWH-311;
96. JWH-312;
97. JWH-313;
98. JWH-314;
99. JWH-315;
Req. No. 10084 Page 17

100. JWH-316;
101. JWH-346;
102. JWH-348;
103. JWH-363;
104. JWH-364;
105. JWH-365;
106. JWH-367;
107. JWH-368;
108. JWH-369;
109. JWH-370;
110. JWH-371;
111. JWH-373;
112. JWH-386;
113. JWH-387;
114. JWH-392;
115. JWH-394;
116. JWH-395;
117. JWH-397;
118. JWH-398;
119. JWH-399;
120. JWH-400;
121. JWH-412;
122. JWH-413;
123. JWH-414;
Req. No. 10084 Page 18

124. JWH-415;
125. CP-55, 940;
126. CP-47, 497;
127. HU-210;
128. HU-211;
129. WIN-55, 212-2;
130. AM-2201;
131. AM-2233;
132. JWH-018 adamantyl-carboxamide;
133. AKB48;
134. JWH-122 N-(4-pentenyl)analog;
135. MAM2201;
136. URB597;
137. URB602;
138. URB754;
139. UR144;
140. XLR11;
141. A-796,260;
142. STS-135;
143. AB-FUBINACA;
144. AB-PINACA;
145. PB-22;
146. AKB48 N-5-Fluorpentyl;
147. AM1248;
Req. No. 10084 Page 19

148. FUB-PB-22;
149. ADB-FUBINACA;
150. BB-22;
151. 5-Fluoro PB-22; or
152. 5-Fluoro AKB-48.
G. In addition to those substances listed in subsection F of
this section, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of a synthetic cannabinoid found to be
in any of the following chemical groups:
1. Naphthoylindoles: any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl
ring to any extent. Naphthoylindoles include, but are not limited
to:
a. 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-
200),
b. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM2201),
Req. No. 10084 Page 20

c. 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-018),
d. 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-073),
e. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-081),
f. 1-propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-015),
g. 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-019),
h. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-122),
i. 1-pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-210),
j. 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-398),
k. 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-007),
l. 1-pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-164),
m. 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole
(JWH-098),
n. 1-pentyl-3-(4-fluoro-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-412),
o. 1-[1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole (AM-1220),
p. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole
(MAM-2201), or
q. 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM-2232);
2. Naphthylmethylindoles: any compound containing a 1H-indol-
3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with or without substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
Req. No. 10084 Page 21

morp holinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the indole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the
naphthyl ring to any extent. Naphthylmethylindoles include, but are
not limited to, (1-pentylindol-3-yl)(1-naphthyl)methane (JWH-175);
3. Naphthoylpyrroles: any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the pyrrole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on
the naphthyl group to any extent. Naphthoylpyrroles include, but
are not limited to:
a. 1-hexyl-2-phenyl-4-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-147),
b. 1-pentyl-5-(2-methylphenyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole
(JWH-370),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-030), or
d. 1-hexyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-147);
4. Naphthylideneindenes: any compound containing a 1-(1-
naphthylmethylene)indene structure with or without substitution at
the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
Req. No. 10084 Page 22

cyan oalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the indene group to any extent, and whether or not substituted on
the naphthyl group to any extent. Naphthylmethylindenes include,
but are not limited to, (1-[(3-pentyl)-1H-inden-1-
ylidene)methyl]naphthalene (JWH-176);
5. Phenylacetylindoles: any compound containing a 3-
phenylacetylindole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the phenyl
ring to any extent. Phenylacetylindoles include, but are not
limited to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-250),
b. 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole
(RCS-8),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole (JWH-203),
Req. No. 10084 Page 23

d. 1-pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-251),
e. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-201), or
f. 1-pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-302);
6. Cyclohexylphenols: any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with or without substitution at
the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, and whether or not further substituted
on the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Cyclohexylphenols include,
but are not limited to:
a. 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-
hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol (CP-47,497),
b. 5-(1,1-dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-
phenol (cannabicyclohexanol; CP-47,497 C8 homologue),
or
c. 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,2R)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-
hydroxypropyl)cyclohexyl]-phenol (CP 55, 940);
7. Benzoylindoles: any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole
structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
Req. No. 10084 Page 24

2-pi peridinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the phenyl
group to any extent. Benzoylindoles include, but are not limited
to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole (RCS-4),
b. 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-2-methyl-3-(4-
methoxybenzoyl)indole (Pravadoline or WIN 48, 098),
c. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-694),
d. 1-pentyl-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-679), or
e. 1-[1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2-
iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-2233);
8. Cyclopropoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-
(cyclopropoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole
ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the

Req. No. 10084 Page 25

cycl opropoyl ring to any extent. Cyclopropoylindoles include, but
are not limited to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole
(UR-144),
b. 1-(5-chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole (5Cl-UR-144), or
c. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole (XLR11);
9. Indole Amides: Any compound containing a 1H-Indole-3-
carboxamide structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not substituted at the carboxamide
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the indole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quninolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Indole
Amides include, but are not limited to:

Req. No. 10084 Page 26

a. N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(2NE1),
b. N-(1-adamantyl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (STS-135),
c. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-
indole-3-carboxamide (ADBICA),
d. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-
fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide (5F-ADBICA),
e. N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(NNE1),
f. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(naphthalene-1-yl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (5F-NNE1),
g. N-benzyl-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide (SDB-006),
or
h. N-benzyl-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(5F-SDB-006);
10. Indole Esters: Any compound containing a 1H-Indole-3-
carboxylate structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not substituted at the carboxylate
Req. No. 10084 Page 27

grou p by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the indole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Indole
Esters include, but are not limited to:
a. quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (PB-
22),
b. quinolin-8-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (5F-PB-22),
c. quinolin-8-yl 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (BB-22),
d. naphthalen-1-yl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (FDU-PB-22), or
e. naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (NM2201);
11. Adamantanoylindoles: Any compound containing an
adamantanyl-(1H-indol-3-yl)methanone structure with or without
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
Req. No. 10084 Page 28

phen yl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted in
the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the
adamantyl ring to any extent. Adamantanoylindoles include, but are
not limited to:
a. adamantan-1-yl[1-[(1-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-1H-
indol-3-yl]methanone (AM1248), or
b. adamantan-1-yl-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone (AB-
001);
12. Carbazole Ketone: Any compound containing (9H-carbazole-3-
yl) methanone structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the carbazole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, with substitution at the carbon of the methanone
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted at the carbazole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Carbazole
Ketones include, but are not limited to, naphthalen-1-yl(9-pentyl-
9H-carbazol-3-yl)methanone (EG-018);
Req. No. 10084 Page 29

13. Benzimidazole Ketone: Any compound containing
(benzimidazole-2-yl) methanone structure with or without
substitution at either nitrogen atom of the benzimidazole ring by an
alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, with substitution at the carbon of the methanone
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the benzimidazole, adamantyl, naphthyl,
phenyl, pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent.
Benzimidazole Ketones include, but are not limited to:
a. naphthalen-1-yl(1-pentyl-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-
l)methanone (JWH-018 benzimidazole analog), or
b. (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-
yl)(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone (FUBIMINA); and
14. Modified by Replacement: any compound defined in this
subsection that is modified by replacement of a carbon with nitrogen
in the indole, naphthyl, indene, benzimidazole, or carbazole ring.

Req. No. 10084 Page 30

H. Any prescription drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration under the provisions of Section 505 of the Federal
Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, Title 21 of the United States Code,
Section 355, that is designated, rescheduled or deleted as a
controlled substance under federal law by the United States Drug
Enforcement Administration shall be excluded from Schedule I and
shall be prescribed, distributed, dispensed or used in accordance
with federal law upon the issuance of a notice, final rule or
interim final rule by the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration designating, rescheduling or deleting as a controlled
substance such a drug product under federal law, unless and until
the State Board of Pharmacy takes action pursuant to Section 2-201
of this title. If the Board of Pharmacy does not take action
pursuant to Section 2-201 of this title, the drug product shall be
deemed to be designated, rescheduled or deleted as a controlled
substance in accordance with federal law and in compliance with the
Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10084 GRS 12/31/24




Req. No. 10084 Page 31